California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(d) In addition to the adjustment in subdivision (c), the rebased County IHSS MOE shall be adjusted for the annualized cost of increases in provider wages, health benefits, or other benefits that are locally negotiated, mediated, or imposed, on or after July 1, 2019, including any increases in provider wages, health benefits, or other benefits adopted by ordinance pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 9100) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code or any future increases resulting from the same, including increases to health benefit premiums. For health benefit premium increases only, for any memorandum of understanding or collective bargaining agreement between the recognized employee organization and the
 county, public authority, or nonprofit consortium, executed or extended and submitted to the department for approval prior to July 1, 2019, through the end date, as specified in the memorandum of understanding or collective bargaining agreement described in this subdivision, the state shall cover 100 percent of the nonfederal share of health benefit premium increases, and there shall not be an adjustment to the rebased County IHSS MOE.

(1) (A) If the department approves the rate for an increase in provider wages or health benefits that are locally negotiated, mediated, imposed, or adopted by ordinance pursuant to Section 12306.1, the state shall pay 65 percent, and the affected county shall pay 35 percent, of the nonfederal share of the cost increase, in accordance with subparagraph (B).

(B) With respect to any increase in provider wages or health benefits
 approved on or after July 1, 2019, pursuant to subparagraph (A), the state shall participate in that increase as provided in subparagraph (A) up to the amount specified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 12306.1. The county shall pay the entire nonfederal share of any cost increase exceeding the amount specified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 12306.1.

(C) With respect to an increase in benefits, other than individual health benefits, locally negotiated, mediated, or imposed by a county, public authority, or nonprofit consortium, or adopted by ordinance, the county’s County IHSS MOE shall include a one-time adjustment equal to 35 percent of the nonfederal share of the increased benefit costs. If the department, in consultation with the California State Association of Counties, determines that the increase is one in which the state does not participate, the county’s County IHSS MOE shall
 include a one-time adjustment for the entire nonfederal share.

(2) If the department does not approve the rate for an increase in provider wages or health benefits, or increase in other benefits pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1), that are locally negotiated, mediated, imposed, or adopted by ordinance pursuant to Section 12306.1, or increase to the public authority administrative rate, the county shall pay the entire cost of the increase.

(3) The county share of increased expenditures pursuant to subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (1), shall be included in the rebased County IHSS MOE, in addition to the amount established under subdivision (c). For any
 increase in provider wages or health benefits, or increase in other benefits pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1), that becomes effective on a date other than July 1, the department shall adjust the county’s rebased County IHSS MOE to reflect the annualized cost of the county’s share of the nonfederal cost of the wage or health benefit increase. This adjustment shall be calculated based on the county’s 2019–20 paid IHSS hours and the appropriate cost-sharing ratio as grown by the applicable number of inflation factors pursuant to subdivision (c) that have occurred up to and including the fiscal year in which the increase becomes effective.

(4) (A) With respect to any rate increases to existing contracts that a county has already entered into pursuant to Section 12302, the state shall pay 65 percent, and the affected county shall pay 35 percent, of the nonfederal share of the amount of the rate increase up to the
 maximum amounts established pursuant to Sections 12302.1 and 12303. The county shall pay the entire nonfederal share of any portion of the rate increase exceeding the maximum amount established pursuant to Sections 12302.1 and 12303. This adjustment shall be calculated based on the county’s 2019–20 paid IHSS contract hours, or the paid contract hours in the fiscal year in which the contract becomes effective if the contract becomes effective on or after July 1, 2019, using the appropriate cost-sharing ratio as grown by the applicable number of inflation factors pursuant to subdivision (c) that have occurred up to and including the fiscal year in which the increase becomes effective.

(B) With respect to rates for new contracts entered into by a county pursuant to Section 12302 on or after July 1, 2019, the state shall pay 65 percent, and the affected county shall pay 35 percent, of the nonfederal share of the difference between the locally
 negotiated, mediated, imposed, or adopted by ordinance provider wage and the contract rate for all of the hours of service to IHSS recipients to be provided under the contract up to the maximum amounts established pursuant to Sections 12302.1 and 12303. The county shall pay the entire nonfederal share of any portion of the contract rate exceeding the maximum amount established pursuant to Sections 12302.1 and 12303. This adjustment shall be calculated based on the county’s paid contract hours in the fiscal year in which the contract becomes effective using the appropriate cost-sharing ratio.

(5) The county share of the expenditures described in paragraph (4) shall be included in the rebased County IHSS MOE, in addition to the amounts established under subdivision (c). For any rate increases for existing contracts or rates for new contracts, entered into by a county pursuant to Section 12302 on or after July 1, 2019, that become effective on a
 date other than July 1, the department shall adjust the county’s rebased County IHSS MOE to reflect the annualized cost of the county’s share of the nonfederal cost of the increase or rate for new contracts. This adjustment shall be calculated as follows:

(A) For a contract described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4), the first-year cost of the amount of the rate increase calculated using the pro rata share of the number of hours of service provided in the contract for the fiscal year in which the increase became effective.

(B) For a contract described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4), the first-year cost of the difference between the locally negotiated, mediated, imposed, or adopted by ordinance provider wage and the contract rate for all of the hours of service to IHSS recipients calculated using the pro rata share of the number of hours of service provided in the
 contract for the fiscal year in which the contract became effective.

(6) If the state ceases to receive enhanced federal financial participation for the provision of services pursuant to Section 1915(k) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(k)), the rebased County IHSS MOE shall be adjusted one time to reflect a 35-percent share of the enhanced federal financial participation that would have been received pursuant to Section 1915(k) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(k)) for the fiscal year in which the state ceases to receive the enhanced federal financial participation.

(7) Beginning July 1, 2026, if the state ceases to receive enhanced federal financial participation for the provision of services pursuant to Section 1915(k) of the federal Social Security
 Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(k)) due to noncompliance of timely case reassessment for the Community First Choice Option program, the county shall pay, separate from the rebased County IHSS MOE payment, a 100-percent share of the enhanced federal financial participation that would have been received pursuant to Section 1915(k) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(k)) for the months in which the state did not receive the enhanced federal financial participation. For the 2025–26 fiscal year, the state and county shall each pay 50 percent of the amount of lost enhanced federal financial participation described in this paragraph. The department shall develop guidance, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, to implement this paragraph.

(8) The rebased County IHSS MOE shall not be adjusted for increases in individual provider wages that are locally negotiated pursuant to subdivision (a) of, and paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (d) of, Section 12306.1 when the increase has been specifically negotiated to take effect at the same time as, and to be the same amount as, state minimum wage increases.

(9) (A) A county may negotiate a wage supplement.

(i) The wage supplement shall be in addition to the highest wage rate paid in the county.

(ii) The first time the wage supplement is applied, the county’s rebased County IHSS MOE shall include a one-time adjustment by the amount of the increased cost resulting from the supplement, as specified in paragraph (1).

(B) A wage supplement negotiated pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall subsequently be applied to the minimum wage when the minimum wage increase is equal to or exceeds the county wage paid without inclusion of the wage supplement and the increase to the county wage paid takes effect at the same time as the minimum wage increase.

(10) The Department of Finance shall consult with the California State Association of Counties to develop the computations for the annualized amounts pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) The rebased County IHSS MOE shall only be adjusted pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d).

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 58) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 7, Sec. 5.   (AB 118)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.17.

(a) A portion of IHSS costs that are the counties’ responsibility shall be offset using a combination of General Fund moneys appropriated in the annual Budget Act and redirected 1991 Realignment Vehicle License Fee growth revenues pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17606.20, as follows:

(1) (A) There is hereby appropriated three hundred sixty-three million nine hundred ninety-eight thousand dollars ($363,998,000) from the General Fund for the 2017–18 fiscal year to offset a portion of IHSS costs incurred by counties. This amount reflects the difference between the combined estimated amounts of 2016–17 and 2017–18 Vehicle License Fee growth revenues that would have been deposited into the Family Support Subaccount of the Vehicle License
 Fee Account of the Local Revenue Fund pursuant to Section 17600.50 and four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000).

(B) The amount of General Fund moneys appropriated in the 2017–18 fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be increased or decreased by the Department of Finance based on revised 2016–17 and 2017–18 Vehicle License Fee growth revenue estimates included in the 2018–19 Governor’s Budget and subsequent May Revision, such that the total offset equals four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000).

(C) The amount of General Fund moneys appropriated in the 2017–18 fiscal year for the In-Home Supportive Services program pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2018.

(2) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, the amount of the General Fund offset provided
 shall be the difference between the amount of 2018–19 Vehicle License Fee growth revenues that would have been deposited into the Family Support Subaccount of the Vehicle License Fee Account of the Local Revenue Fund pursuant to Section 17600.50 and three hundred thirty million dollars ($330,000,000).

(b) The Department of Finance shall consult with the California State Association of Counties to determine the distribution of General Fund moneys available for offset of each county’s IHSS costs in each fiscal year as specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 80.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.18.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund to any county in an amount not to exceed the net cost to the county resulting from the County’s IHSS MOE pursuant to Sections 12306.16, 12306.17, and 17606.20.

(b) To be considered for a loan, the county shall submit a request, after approval by the county board of supervisors, to the Director of Finance that includes all of the following:

(1) Information that demonstrates that the county is experiencing significant financial hardship.

(2) The amount of funding requested.

(3) The duration of the loan, not to exceed three years.

(c) The Director of Finance shall respond to a request in writing within 45 days. If approved, the written notice shall include the repayment schedule as determined by the Director of Finance, in consultation with the county, and the interest rate, which shall not exceed the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account at the time of the loan. The Director of Finance may waive interest charges at any time.

(d) The Director of Finance, in consultation with the county, shall provide a schedule to the Controller for the disbursement of the loan amount for each county that receives a loan under this section. The Controller shall pay the county per the schedule within 14 days of receipt.

(e) Loans
 shall be available in the 2017–18, 2018–19, and 2019–20 fiscal years. The sum of all loans approved during any fiscal year pursuant to this section shall not exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000).

(f) The county shall submit loan installment payments to the Controller as specified in subdivision (c) and notify the Director of Finance when each payment is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 25, Sec. 28.   (SB 90)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.19.

(a) The department shall review the budgeting methodology used to determine the annual funding for county administration of the IHSS program and examine the ongoing workload and administrative costs to counties as part of the review for the 2025–26 fiscal year, the 2029–30 fiscal year, and every third fiscal year thereafter.

(b) The department shall provide information to the appropriate legislative budget committees regarding this review and how it may impact county administrative costs, as part of the budget proposed by either January 10 or May 14 of any year prior to the fiscal year for which this subdivision applies.

(c) In implementing this section, the department shall consult legislative staff, representatives of county human services agencies, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, advocate representatives, and labor organizations that represent county workers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 20.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 2000–01 fiscal year, the state shall pay 65 percent and each county shall pay 35 percent of the nonfederal share of any increase to individual provider wages a county chooses to grant, up to 3 percent above the statewide minimum wage.

(b) This section shall not apply to providers who are employees of a public authority or nonprofit consortium pursuant to Section 12301.6.

(c) This section shall be operative on January 1, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 108, Sec. 44.8.   Effective July 10, 2000.   Section operative January 1, 2001, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.21.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 2001–02 fiscal year, the state shall pay 65 percent and each county shall pay 35 percent of the nonfederal share of any increase to individual provider wages a county chooses to grant, up to 5.31 percent above the statewide minimum wage.

(b) This section shall not apply to providers who are employees of a public authority or nonprofit consortium pursuant to Section 12301.6.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 111, Sec. 37.   Effective July 30, 2001.   Applicable from July 1, 2001, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.3.

In consultation with stakeholder organizations, including, but not limited to, the California State Association of Counties and employee organizations representing in-home supportive service workers, the department shall develop and evaluate various options for providing health care benefits for uninsured individual in-home supportive services providers who are not employees of a public authority or nonprofit consortium under Section 12301.6. The department shall report its findings and recommendations to the Legislature by January 15, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 108, Sec. 45.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.5.

(a) Any public or private agency, including a contractor under Section 12302.1, who maintains a list or registry of prospective in-home supportive services providers shall require proof of identification from a prospective provider. This identification shall be provided prior to placing the prospective provider on a list or registry or supplying a name from the list or registry to an applicant for, or recipient of, in-home supportive services.

(b) For purposes of this section, proof of identification includes, but is not limited to, a positive photograph identification
 from a government source.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 795, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.6.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, beginning on the date for which the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services authorizes commencement of the implementation of this
 section, but no earlier than January 1, 2012, and concurrent with the collection of the sales tax extended to support services pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 6150) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, a provider of in-home supportive services shall receive a supplementary payment under this article equal to a percentage, as set forth in paragraph (2), of the gross receipts, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6150 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, of the provider for the sale of in-home supportive services, plus an amount described in paragraph (3) if applicable. If the underlying payment for in-home supportive services that is being supplemented is a Medi-Cal payment, then the supplementary payment shall also be a Medi-Cal payment. Supplementary payments shall be made only to those providers from whom the tax imposed pursuant to Section 6151 of the Revenue and Taxation Code has been collected.

(2) The percentage applicable to the supplementary payment required by paragraph (1) shall equal the rate described in subdivision (b) of Section 6151 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and shall only be applied to services provided under this article, including personal care option services reimbursable under the Medi-Cal program.

(3) The supplementary payment of an individual provider whose payroll withholding required for federal income tax purposes and for purposes of taxation for the Social Security and Medicare programs is increased due to the supplementary payment, in comparison to the amounts for those purposes that would be withheld without the supplementary payment, shall be increased by an additional amount that is equal to the amount of this additional federal withholding.

(b) (1) All revenues deposited in the Personal Care IHSS Quality
 Assurance Revenue Fund established pursuant to Section 6168 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be used solely for purposes of the In-Home Supportive Services program, including, but not limited to, those services provided under the Medi-Cal program. All supplementary payments required by this section shall be paid from the Personal Care IHSS Quality Assurance Revenue Fund.

(2) The Director of Finance shall determine the sum required to be deposited in the Personal Care IHSS Quality Assurance Revenue Fund to fund the initial supplementary payments from the fund. As soon thereafter as reasonably possible, this sum shall be transferred, in the form of a loan, from the General Fund to the Personal Care IHSS Quality Assurance Revenue Fund. At the time sufficient revenues have been deposited in the Personal Care IHSS Quality Assurance Revenue Fund pursuant to Section 6168 of the Revenue and Taxation Code to sustain the continued operation of the
 fund for that portion of the supplementary payment described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) plus an additional amount equal to the General Fund loan made pursuant to this paragraph, plus interest, the sum transferred from the General Fund, including interest, shall be repaid to the General Fund. Subsequent supplementary payments pursuant to this section shall be made from revenue deposited in the Personal Care IHSS Quality Assurance Revenue Fund pursuant to Section 6168 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(3) The Department of Finance, on an ongoing basis, shall determine the amount necessary to implement paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), and subdivision (c) of Section 12302.2, and immediately transfer this amount from the General Fund to the Personal Care IHSS Quality Assurance Revenue Fund.

(c) (1) The Director of Health Care Services shall seek all
 federal Medicaid approvals necessary to implement this section, including using the revenues obtained pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 6150) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code as the nonfederal share for supplementary payments. As part of that request for approval, the director shall seek to make the supplementary payments effective as of January 1, 2012.

(2) This section shall become operative only if the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services grants Medicaid approvals sought pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) If Medicaid approval is granted pursuant to paragraph (2), within 10 days of that approval the Director of Health Care Services shall notify the State Board of Equalization and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature of the approval.

(d) If Article 4 (commencing with Section 6150) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code becomes inoperative pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6170 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, supplementary payments shall cease to be made pursuant to subdivision (a) when all moneys in the fund have been expended.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department and the State Department of Health Care Services may implement and administer this section through all-county letters or similar instruction from the department and the State Department of Health Care Services until regulations are adopted. The department and the State Department of Health Care Services shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this section no later than
 12 months following the initial effective date of the supplementary payments. The department and the State Department of Health Care Services may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as or substantially equivalent to an emergency regulation previously adopted under this section.

(2) The initial adoption of emergency regulations implementing this section and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this subdivision shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review and approval by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for
 filing with the Secretary of State and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations may be adopted.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until the January 1 following the date supplementary payments cease to be made pursuant to subdivision (d), and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 47, Sec. 36.   (SB 1041)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Section conditionally operative as provided in subd. (c).   Repealed conditionally as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12307.

The amendments to Sections 12302, 12303 and 12304 of, and the addition of Sections 12303.5 and 12304.5 to, the Welfare and Institutions Code made by Chapter 75 of the Statutes of 1974 do not constitute a change in, but are declaratory of, the preexisting law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------

12308.

Funding of this article is subject to the provisions of Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 10100) of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1235.   Note: Repeal conditions in Sec. 14 of Ch. 1235 failed.)
-------------------------------------------

12309.

(a) In order to assure that in-home supportive services are delivered in all counties in a uniform manner, the department shall develop a uniform needs assessment tool.

(b) (1) Each county shall, in administering this article, use the uniform needs assessment tool developed pursuant to subdivision (a) in collecting and
 evaluating information.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “information” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The recipient’s living environment.

(B) Alternative resources.

(C) The recipient’s functional abilities.

(c) (1) The uniform needs assessment tool developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall evaluate the recipient’s functioning in activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living.

(2) The recipient’s functioning shall be quantified, using the general hierarchical five-point scale for ranking each function, as specified in subdivision (d).

(d) The recipient’s functioning ranks shall be as follows:

(1) Rank one. A recipient’s functioning shall be classified as rank one if his or her functioning is independent, and he or she is able to perform the function without human assistance, although the recipient may have difficulty in performing the function, but the completion of the function, with or without a device or mobility aid, poses no substantial risk to his or her safety.

(2) Rank two. A recipient’s functioning shall be classified as rank two if he or she is able to perform a function, but needs verbal assistance, such as reminding, guidance, or encouragement.

(3) Rank three. A recipient’s functioning shall be classified
 as rank three if he or she can perform the function with some human assistance, including, but not limited to, direct physical assistance from a provider.

(4) Rank four. A recipient’s functioning shall be classified as rank four if he or she can perform a function, but only with substantial human assistance.

(5) Rank five. A recipient’s functioning shall be classified as rank five if he or she cannot perform the function, with or without human assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 4, Sec. 9.   (SB 67)   Effective May 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12309.1.

(a) As a condition of receiving services under this article, or Section 14132.95 or 14132.952, an applicant for or recipient of services shall obtain a certification from a licensed health care professional, including, but not limited to, a physician, physician assistant, regional center clinician or clinician supervisor, occupational therapist, physical therapist, psychiatrist, psychologist, optometrist, ophthalmologist, or public health nurse, declaring that the applicant or recipient is unable to perform some activities of daily living independently, and that without services to assist the applicant or recipient with activities of daily living, the applicant or recipient is at risk of placement in out-of-home care.

(1) For purposes of this section, a licensed
 health care professional means an individual licensed in California by the appropriate California regulatory agency, acting within the scope of their license or certificate as defined in the Business and Professions Code.

(2) Except as provided in subparagraph (A) or (B), or subdivision (c), the certification shall be received prior to service authorization, and services shall not be authorized in the absence of the certification.

(A) Services may be authorized prior to receipt of the certification when the services have been requested on behalf of an individual being discharged from a hospital or nursing home and services are needed to enable the individual to return safely to their home or into the community.

(B) Services may be authorized temporarily pending receipt of the certification when the county determines
 that there is a risk of out-of-home placement.

(3) The county shall consider the certification as one indicator of the need for in-home supportive services, but the certification shall not be the sole determining factor.

(4) The health care professional’s certification shall include, at a minimum, both of the following:

(A) A statement by the professional, as defined in subdivision (a), that the individual is unable to independently perform one or more activities of daily living, and that one or more of the services available under the IHSS program is recommended for the applicant or recipient, in order to prevent the need for out-of-home care.

(B) A description of any condition or functional limitation that has resulted in, or contributed to, the
 applicant’s or recipient’s need for assistance.

(b) The department, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services and with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, representatives of program recipients, providers, and counties, shall develop a standard certification form for use in all counties that includes, but is not limited to, all of the conditions in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a). The form shall include a description of the In-Home Supportive Services program and the services the program can provide when authorized after a social worker’s assessment of eligibility. The form shall not, however, require health care professionals to certify the applicant’s or recipient’s need for each individual service.

(c) The department, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services and stakeholders, as defined in subdivision (b), shall identify
 alternative documentation that shall be accepted by counties to meet the requirements of this section, including, but not limited to, hospital or nursing facility discharge plans, minimum data set forms, individual program plans, or other documentation that contains the necessary information, consistent with the requirements specified in subdivision (a).

(d) The department shall develop a letter for use by counties to inform recipients of the requirements of subdivision (a). The letter shall be understandable to the recipient, and shall be translated into all languages spoken by a substantial number of the public served by the In-Home Supportive Services program, in accordance with Section 7295.2 of the Government Code.

(e) This section does not apply to a recipient who is receiving services in accordance with this article or Section 14132.95 or 14132.952 on the operative date of
 this section until the date of the recipient’s first reassessment following the operative date of this section, as provided in subdivision (g).

(1) The recipient shall be notified of the certification requirement before or at the time of the reassessment, and shall submit the certification within 45 days following the reassessment in order to continue to be authorized for receipt of services.

(2) A county may extend the 45-day period for a recipient to submit the medical certification on a case-by-case basis, if the county determines that good cause for the delay exists.

(f) A licensed health care professional shall not charge a fee for the completion of the certification form.

(g) This section shall become operative on the first
 day of the first month following 90 days after the effective date of Chapter 8 of the Statutes of 2011, or July 1, 2011, whichever is later.

(h) The State Department of Health Care Services shall provide notice to all Medi-Cal managed care plans, directing the plans to assess all Medi-Cal recipients applying for or receiving in-home supportive services, in order to make the certifications required by this section.

(i) If the Director of Health Care Services determines that a Medicaid State Plan amendment is necessary to implement subdivision (b) of Section 14132.95, this section shall not be implemented until federal approval is received.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 281.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

12310.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the department conduct special pilot projects to test appropriate methods for assuring equity and efficiency in reducing program costs necessary to remain within budget appropriations pursuant to Sections 12301 and 12306, and which use the experience gained and the techniques developed by the in-home supportive services demonstration projects conducted by the University of California in Alameda, Contra Costa, and Marin Counties. The department may establish pilot projects in Alameda and Marin Counties for the purpose of assessing methods which allow for all of the following:

(a) Greater equity in decisions regarding eligibility and level of service as a means of reducing program costs.

(b) Administrative reforms that promote greater economy in program administration.

(c) Less costly processes for periodic redetermination of eligibility and service awards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 69, Sec. 22.2.   Effective June 17, 1981.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 35 of Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

12311.

The director is authorized to grant such waivers from the provisions of this article as are necessary to carry out the purposes and intent of this section, however, the county must provide services within its allocation. The department shall evaluate the results of these pilot studies which shall include a comparison of results obtained by nonpilot counties in their efforts to maintain a budget-managed in-home supportive services program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 69, Sec. 22.4.   Effective June 17, 1981.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 35 of Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

12312.

A county, including a city and county, shall, upon the next update to its emergency plan, integrate and require the assessment and provision of supportive services to in-home supportive services (IHSS) recipients, including, but not limited to, the following requirements:

(a) Protocols and authorization for county social workers to make expedited assessments of the needs of current and potential IHSS recipients during times of a natural disaster.

(b) Protocols to ensure that authorized services will continue to be provided to recipients during times of displacement resulting from a natural disaster.

(c) Protocols to address any specific and unique needs of IHSS recipients that have not previously been addressed in the county’s or the city and county’s emergency plan pursuant to Section 8593.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 789, Sec. 6.   (SB 1040)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12314.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the department conduct a pilot program, of not less than three years’ duration, to comprehensively assess the comparative cost effectiveness and quality of care of both contract and individual provider modes of service.

The pilot project will test alternative methods to maximize delivery of services under this article within budget appropriations. The project may also investigate the feasibility of the “capitation” method of payment in any or all of the counties participating in the project. County participation shall be on a voluntary basis.

The department shall have the authority, if necessary, to reallocate available funds as necessary to ensure the success of the project within the overall state budget.

The director may issue waivers, as necessary, pursuant to Section 18204.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 852, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12315.

(a) (1) Commencing January 1, 2009, a pilot project shall be established in five consenting counties that provides severely impaired recipients who receive in-home supportive services under this article through the public authority, as described in Section 12301.6, with a choice of receiving services through the public authority or receiving services through a voluntary nonprofit or
 proprietary agency pursuant to Section 12302. The pilot project shall be developed to provide services to severely impaired recipients, as described in Section 12303.4.

(2) To accomplish this end, the five consenting counties shall administer the In-Home Supportive Services (IHSS) program through a public authority pursuant to Section 12301.6.

(3) (A) Following the submission of input and recommendations of the IHSS advisory committee for the county, each participating county, with the consent of the public authority in that county, or the public authority, with the consent of the participating county, shall contract with a voluntary nonprofit or proprietary agency, pursuant to Section 12302.

(B) Severely impaired recipients in each participating county may continue to receive supportive
 services through the county’s public authority, or may choose to receive services through the voluntary nonprofit or proprietary agency, pursuant to paragraph (1). Recipients who choose to receive services through the voluntary nonprofit or proprietary agency shall be compensated only for those services described in the recipients’ then-existing care plan, as approved by the county social worker.

(4) Administrative costs of the pilot project, including the cost of developing guidelines other than the guidelines in this section and the cost of administering the project and providing oversight, shall not be paid by the state. Instead, an estimate of administrative costs shall be included in the county request for proposal for each contract with the voluntary nonprofit or proprietary agency and administrative costs shall then be paid by the agency up to the amount estimated unless the county and agency reach an alternative cost-sharing agreement
 in the contract that does not involve state participation.
